dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.dix
    <pardef n="te/ntuxa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ntuxa</l><r>ntuxa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tniex</l><r>ntuxa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/mis__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>mis</l><r>mis<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>omos</l><r>mis<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħl/iqa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>iqa</l><r>iqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejjaq</l><r>iqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/adim__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>adim</l><r>adim<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>odma</l><r>adim<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/iċċa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>iċċa</l><r>iċċa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ċejjeċ</l><r>iċċa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="xħ/iħ__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>iħ</l><r>iħ<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aħ</l><r>iħ<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/ut__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ut</l><r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wiet</l><r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x/afra__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>afra</l><r>afra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fafar</l><r>afra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fw/ieħa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ieħa</l><r>ieħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejjaħ</l><r>ieħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ġ/urnata__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>urnata</l><r>urnata<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ranet</l><r>urnata<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lin/fa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>fa</l><r>fa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ef</l><r>fa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n/adif__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>adif</l><r>adif<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>daf</l><r>adif<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>odfa</l><r>adif<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kċ/ina__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ina</l><r>ina<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejjen</l><r>ina<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="għ/aref__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>aref</l><r>aref<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>orrief</l><r>aref<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/artas__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>artas</l><r>artas<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ratas</l><r>artas<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rietes</l><r>artas<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="z/okk__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>okk</l><r>okk<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kuk</l><r>okk<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="st/orja__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>orja</l><r>orja<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejjer</l><r>orja<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/riq__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>riq</l><r>riq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oroq</l><r>riq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x/abla__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>abla</l><r>abla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wabel</l><r>abla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rot/ta__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ta</l><r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ot</l><r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sop/pa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>pa</l><r>pa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>op</l><r>pa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ċar/ru__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ru</l><r>ru<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ar</l><r>ru<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gv/erta__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>erta</l><r>erta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ieret</l><r>erta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/apit__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>apit</l><r>apit<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wapet</l><r>apit<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n/uffata__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>uffata</l><r>uffata<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fafat</l><r>uffata<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fafet</l><r>uffata<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fiefet</l><r>uffata<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/ir__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ir</l><r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jar</l><r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gel/gul__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>gul</l><r>gul<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>glie</l><r>gul<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bel/bul__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>bul</l><r>bul<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>blie</l><r>bul<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/avla__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>avla</l><r>avla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wavel</l><r>avla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħ/arbux__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>arbux</l><r>arbux<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riebex</l><r>arbux<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ż/arġun__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>arġun</l><r>arġun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>raġan</l><r>arġun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>raġen</l><r>arġun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/aħżen__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>aħżen</l><r>aħżen<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħażen</l><r>aħżen<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/awt__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>awt</l><r>awt<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wat</l><r>awt<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/idwi__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>idwi</l><r>idwi<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>diewa</l><r>idwi<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/isqija__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>isqija</l><r>isqija<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sieqi</l><r>isqija<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/amar__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>amar</l><r>amar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mura</l><r>amar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/ażquż__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ażquż</l><r>ażquż<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>żieqeż</l><r>ażquż<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/azzett__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>azzett</l><r>azzett<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ziezet</l><r>azzett<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="gverta"><i>gv</i><par n="gv/erta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qmis"><i>q</i><par n="q/mis__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="maħżen"><i>m</i><par n="m/aħżen__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bidwi"><i>b</i><par n="b/idwi__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ponta"><i>pon</i><par n="rot/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġurnata"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/urnata__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xħiħ"><i>xħ</i><par n="xħ/iħ__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fartas"><i>f</i><par n="f/artas__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gaffa"><i>gaf</i><par n="lin/fa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħarbux"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/arbux__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="grotta"><i>grot</i><par n="rot/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="triq"><i>t</i><par n="t/riq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="zokk"><i>z</i><par n="z/okk__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għaref"><i>għ</i><par n="għ/aref__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sawt"><i>s</i><par n="s/awt__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tapit"><i>t</i><par n="t/apit__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qadim"><i>q</i><par n="q/adim__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fisqija"><i>f</i><par n="f/isqija__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gelgul"><i>gel</i><par n="gel/gul__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="nadif"><i>n</i><par n="n/adif__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħliqa"><i>ħl</i><par n="ħl/iqa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xafra"><i>x</i><par n="x/afra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċarru"><i>ċar</i><par n="ċar/ru__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qamar"><i>q</i><par n="q/amar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="belbul"><i>bel</i><par n="bel/bul__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġonta"><i>ġon</i><par n="rot/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tavla"><i>t</i><par n="t/avla__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="torta"><i>tor</i><par n="rot/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fwieħa"><i>fw</i><par n="fw/ieħa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="mgħarfa"><i>mgħar</i><par n="lin/fa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xabla"><i>x</i><par n="x/abla__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bir"><i>b</i><par n="b/ir__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qażquż"><i>q</i><par n="q/ażquż__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sħiħ"><i>sħ</i><par n="xħ/iħ__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="flotta"><i>flot</i><par n="rot/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="razzett"><i>r</i><par n="r/azzett__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="biċċa"><i>b</i><par n="b/iċċa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="staffa"><i>staf</i><par n="lin/fa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="soppa"><i>sop</i><par n="sop/pa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xkaffa"><i>xkaf</i><par n="lin/fa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="nuffata"><i>n</i><par n="n/uffata__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="storja"><i>st</i><par n="st/orja__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kċina"><i>kċ</i><par n="kċ/ina__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="rotta"><i>rot</i><par n="rot/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="linfa"><i>lin</i><par n="lin/fa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="but"><i>b</i><par n="b/ut__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tentuxa"><i>te</i><par n="te/ntuxa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żarġun"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/arġun__n_GD"/></e>
